Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.150

Abandonment of property.

The receiver, or any party in interest, upon order of the court following notice and a hearing, and upon the conditions or terms the court considers just and proper, may abandon any estate property that is burdensome to the receiver or is of inconsequential value or benefit. However, a receiver may not abandon property that is a hazard or potential hazard to the public in contravention of a state statute or rule that is reasonably designed to protect the public health or safety from identified hazards, including but not limited to chapters 70A.300 and 70A.305 RCW. Property that is abandoned no longer constitutes estate property.

[ 2021 c 65 s 7; 2004 c 165 s 17.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.